New Jersey, session 221, A2289.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Commissioner of Community Affairs shall, to the extent permitted by federal law, continuously maintain an open enrollment period in which rental assistance applicants may submit pre-applications to be placed on the waiting list for the federal Housing Choice Voucher Program, authorized pursuant to section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. s.1437f), that is administered by the department. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the third month next following enactment, except the commissioner may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.